Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-602
Faculty, administrative staff, student; dismissal or expulsion; procedure.

No person shall be dismissed or expelled under the provisions of section 85-601 until he has been accorded a public hearing under rules and regulations for the administration of sections 85-601 to 85-605 established by the governing body of the institution. Notice of such hearing and a formal written statement of the charges against him shall be served by either registered or certified mail, sent to his current address as shown on the records of the institution, at least twenty days before the date set for hearing. He shall be entitled to file a written response to such charges, to be present in person and by counsel at the hearing, and to testify and produce other witnesses on his behalf.

Laws 1971, LB 445, § 2.